Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
454F

SECURE AND
FAIR ENFORCEMENT FOR MORTGAGE

LICENSING
ACT

Part I. General Provisions

Section

454F-1 Definitions

454F-1.5 Registration with NMLS required

454F-1.6 Presumption of control

454F-1.7 Duties of a mortgage loan originator
company's

qualified individual and branch manager

454F-1.8 Sponsorship by mortgage loan originator
company,

exempt sponsoring mortgage loan originator
company,

or nonprofit organization

454F-2 Exemptions

454F-2.5 Exempt sponsoring mortgage loan originator
company;

registration

454F-3 Requirement of licensure

454F-4 License and registration; application;
issuance

454F-4.5 Automatic secondary review of license
application

454F-4.8 Decision denying application subject to administrative

hearing

454F-4.9 Abandoned applications

454F-5 Issuance of license

454F-6 Pre-licensing and re-licensing; education
of mortgage

loan originators

454F-7 Testing of mortgage loan originators

454F-8 Standards for license renewal

454F-8.5 Reinstatement of expired licenses

454F-9 Continuing education; mortgage loan
originators

454F-10 Authority to require license

454F-10.5 Authorized places of business; designation
of qualified

individuals and branch managers; branch
offices;

principal office; relocation

454F-10.6 Voluntary cessation of operation;
surrender of license

454F-10.7 Change in control of a licensee; fees

454F-11 NMLS registry information; challenge
process

454F-12 Enforcement authorities; violations;
penalties

454F-13 Repealed

454F-14 Confidentiality

454F-15 Investigation and examination authority

454F-16 Mortgage call reports

454F-17 Prohibited practices

454F-18 Powers of commissioner

454F-19 Unique identifier shown

454F-20 Report to NMLS

454F-21 Repealed

454F-22 Mortgage loan originator, mortgage loan
originator

company, exempt sponsoring mortgage loan

originator company, and nonprofit organization
fees

454F-23 Payment of fees

454F-24 Limited exemption for mortgage loan
originators

employed by mortgage servicers

454F-25 Nonprofit organizations; mortgage loan
originators

454F-26 Repealed

Part II. Mortgage Loan Recovery Fund

454F-41 Mortgage loan recovery fund; use of fund;
fees

454F-42 Statute of limitation; recovery from fund

454F-43 Management of fund

454F-44 Standing

454F-45 Subrogation of rights

454F-46 Waiver of rights

454F-47 Disciplinary action against licensee

Note

Hiring and temporary exchange of employees. L 2010, c 84, §§31,
33, and 34.

Revision Note

Chapter was enacted as an addition to title 22 but is
redesignated to title 25 pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next